Tennessee, session 114, HB1036.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-8-1508, is amended by
designating the existing language as subsection (a) and adding the following as a new
subsection:
(b) After the first full school year of operation for an innovative school district in
this state, the department shall evaluate the effectiveness of the innovative school
district and make recommendations to the education committee of the senate and the
committee of the house of representatives having jurisdiction over education. The
department's recommendations may include encouraging additional public universities to
operate an innovative school district based upon future state educational needs.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1036
003152
- 1 -